Arkansas, session 2025, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-47-503 is amended to read as follows:
23-47-503. Loans involving stock of state bank — Definition.
(a) It Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section,
it shall be unlawful for any a state bank to knowingly:
(1) Loan its funds to its stockholders on its own stock, or
stock in its bank holding company, as collateral security;
(2) Make any a loan, the proceeds of which are used to purchase
its own stock or stock of its bank holding company; or
(3)(A) Carry as an asset any a loan representing, either
directly or indirectly, an investment in its own stock or that of its bank
holding company.
(B) Provided, however, that there shall be no It is not a
violation of this subdivision (a)(3) when a bank acquires its own stock or
stock in its bank holding company in the regular course of collecting a debt
previously contracted in good faith if the bank:
(i) complied Complied with subdivisions (a)(1) and
(2) of this section at the time the loan was made; and
(ii) if the bank divests Divests the stock within
*ANS109*
03-05-2025 14:21:28 ANS109

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB242
two (2) years.
(b)(1) In connection with the merger of a target institution with a
state bank or a similar transaction as determined by the Bank Commissioner, a
state bank may acquire a loan or other extension of credit that is secured,
in whole or in part, by the state bank’s own stock or its bank holding
company stock.
(2) A state bank may maintain a loan or other extension of
credit that is secured, in whole or in part, by its own stock or its bank
holding company stock that it has acquired under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, including by renewing, extending, modifying, or refinancing the loan
or other extension of credit, if:
(A) The state bank does not increase the committed amount
of the loan or other extension of credit above the committed amount as of the
time at which it was acquired; and
(B) Each renewal, extension, modification, or refinancing
of the loan or other extension of credit is undertaken on substantially the
same terms and following credit underwriting procedures that are no less
stringent than those prevailing at the time for comparable transactions by
the state bank for which the state bank’s own stock or its bank holding
company stock does not serve as collateral security.
(c) This section does not prohibit a state bank from making or
maintaining a loan or other extension of credit that is secured, in whole or
in part, by a securities account, notwithstanding that the state bank’s own
stock or its bank holding company stock is credited to the securities
account, if:
(1) The state bank or bank holding company whose stock is
credited to the securities account is exempted by § 23-48-316(b)(3);
(2) The state bank maintains written policies and procedures
that require the exclusion of the state bank’s own stock or its bank holding
company stock from consideration during the state bank’s credit underwriting
of the loan or other extension of credit; and
(3) The state bank complies with other applicable laws or rules.
(d)(1) Any An officer or director of any a state bank or any a
stockholder violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to
civil money penalties of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day, up to a
maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the aggregate, for each
03-05-2025 14:21:28 ANS109

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB242
violation.
(2) The civil penalties may be imposed by the commissioner
pursuant to his or her power to and the procedure for issuing cease and
desist orders.
(e) As used in this section, "target institution" means:
(1) A state bank;
(2) An out-of-state state-chartered bank;
(3) A national bank; or
(4) Another depository institution or financial institution.

/s/Hill

























03-05-2025 14:21:28 ANS109